Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 28 Tourist Courts

Cross references.

Regulation of hotels, inns, roadhouses, and others, T. 43, C. 21.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Tourist accommodations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Food and Lodging Establishments, Subject 511-6-2.

31-28-1.
“Tourist court” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “tourist court” means:

Any facility consisting of two or more rooms or dwelling units providing lodging and other accommodations for tourists and travelers and includes tourist courts, tourist cottages, tourist homes, trailer parks, trailer courts, motels, motor hotels, hotels, and any similar place by whatever name called; and

Any facility or establishment operated in conjunction with an establishment described in paragraph (1) of this Code section for the purpose of providing food, beverage, laundry, or recreational services.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1101, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-28-2.
Issuance of permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to operate a tourist court without having first obtained a valid permit therefor. Such permit shall be issued by the county board of health or its duly authorized representative, subject to supervision and direction by the Department of Public Health but, where the county board of health is not functioning, the permit shall be issued by the department. A permit shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable with respect to person or location.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1102, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-28-3.
Denial, suspension, and revocation of permits.

The county boards of health may suspend or revoke permits where the health, sanitation, and safety of the public require such action. When, in the judgment of such board or its duly authorized agents, it is necessary and proper that such application for a permit be denied or that a permit previously granted be suspended or revoked, the applicant or holder of the permit shall be notified thereof in writing and shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. In the event that such application is finally denied or such permit finally suspended or revoked, the applicant or holder thereof shall be given notice in writing, which notice shall specifically state the reasons why the application or permit has been suspended, revoked, or denied.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-1103, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 31.

31-28-4.
Administrative review of local government order.

Any person substantially affected by any final order of the county board of health denying, suspending, revoking, or refusing to renew any permit provided under this chapter may secure review thereof by appeal to the department as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1104, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-28-5.
Standards for health, sanitation, and safety.

The Department of Public Health and county boards of health shall have the power to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to ensure the protection of the public health. Such rules and regulations shall prescribe reasonable standards for health, sanitation, and safety of tourist courts with regard to:

Location, drainage, and maintenance of grounds;

Size, ventilation, and maintenance of sleeping rooms, toilet and washrooms, and laundry rooms, where provided;

Installation of all electrical equipment and exposed electrical wiring;

Heating appliances and equipment, and installation thereof;

Water supply, plumbing fixtures and installations;

Sewage disposal;

Garbage and refuse disposal;

Control of vermin;

Accident prevention; and

Spacing of trailer coaches and lighting of trailer parks.

County boards of health are empowered to adopt and promulgate supplementary rules and regulations consistent with those adopted and promulgated by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-1105, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Standards and requirements for construction of buildings generally, §

8-2-1

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-28-6.
Inspection of premises.

The Department of Public Health and the county boards of health and their duly authorized agents are authorized and empowered to enforce compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this chapter and, in connection therewith, to enter upon and inspect the premises of a tourist court at any reasonable time and in a reasonable manner, as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-1106, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-28-7.
Penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation operating a tourist court without a valid permit shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 475, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-1107, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.